Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ASSISTED LIVING AND CHILD CARE CENTER IN COSMOS.new text end new text begin $6,800,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to ANZ Inc. to design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip a multifamily housing facility at 130 Neptune Street North in the city of Cosmos, to provide supportive services for senior citizens and a child care center for children not yet in kindergarten, and an after-school and weekend programming facility for school-aged children. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end